Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-729
Street railway systems; powers of city.

A city of the primary class may authorize or permit the use of its roads, streets, highways, alleys, or other public rights-of-way for street railway systems.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 106, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4539;

C.S.1922, § 3925;

C.S.1929, § 15-718;

R.S.1943, § 15-729;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 123.
November 14, 2020
The right to levy a special tax against a street railway company to pay the cost of paving along its track is valid and is not class legislation. City of Lincoln v. Lincoln St. Ry. Co., 67 Neb. 469, 93 N.W. 766 (1903); Lincoln Street Ry. Co. v. City of Lincoln, 61 Neb. 109, 84 N.W. 802 (1901).